lexc/noun/enhujaje.lexc
!!!enhu2.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§EOA§ §uue§ §ooez3§ §OEOE1§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oeoez1§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§
§VV§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §AAX§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t     #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§     #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l     #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounae
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possae;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possae
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§AAX§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§AA§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§AA§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§AA§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§AA§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§AA§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§AA§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Noun
acélmag AddNoun;
adatgramm AddNoun;
adásvéghang AddNoun;
aggastyánhang AddNoun;
agyrémprogram AddNoun;
akcióosztag AddNounae;
akcióprojekt AddNoun;
alapdiagram AddNoun;
alapsáv AddNoun;
alkalmazáskód AddNoun;
alprogram AddNoun;
amulett AddNoun;
antennacsomag AddNoun;
anyasejtmag AddNoun;
aranykód AddNoun;
aszaltszilvamag AddNoun;
atomprogram AddNoun;
autóosztag AddNounae;
autópályasáv AddNoun;
autósosztag AddNounae;
babmag AddNoun;
bankkód AddNoun;
barátrom AddNoun;
beltag AddNoun;
beszédprogram AddNoun;
betétcsomag AddNoun;
betűosztag AddNounae;
beállításcsomag AddNoun;
billentyűzetprogram AddNoun;
bizonyságcsomag AddNoun;
blokádosztag AddNounae;
bogárfarm AddNoun;
bolhaosztag AddNounae;
bombaosztag AddNounae;
bombázóosztag AddNounae;
bontóhang AddNoun;
boszorkányfurfang AddNoun;
brókercsomag AddNoun;
burkolólapprogram AddNoun;
bálnahang AddNoun;
bázisprojekt AddNoun;
bélyegmenedzsment AddNoun;
bónuszkód AddNoun;
börtönosztag AddNounae;
búvárosztag AddNounae;
búzaasztag AddNoun;
büntetőosztag AddNounae;
bőrcafrang AddNoun;
celluloidsáv AddNoun;
cigányprogram AddNoun;
citerahang AddNoun;
csapatkód AddNoun;
csatornaprogram AddNoun;
csendőrosztag AddNounae;
csengőgang AddNoun;
cserkészhang AddNoun;
csillagfürtvetőmag AddNoun;
csipogóhang AddNoun;
csirkeosztag AddNounae;
csokiharang AddNoun;
csoporthang AddNoun;
császárdóm AddNoun;
csúcsdiagram AddNoun;
csőtag AddNoun;
célprogram AddNoun;
cölöpsáv AddNoun;
delfinosztag AddNounae;
demokráciacsomag AddNoun;
detektívosztag AddNounae;
diagramm AddNoun;
divatmenedzsment AddNoun;
dobgépprogram AddNoun;
doktoranduszprogram AddNoun;
dresszkód AddNoun;
drogosztag AddNounae;
dzsesszprojekt AddNoun;
dísznövénymag AddNoun;
ebédprogram AddNoun;
egyházparlament AddNoun;
ekedob AddNoun;
elhárítóosztag AddNounae;
elitgőg AddNoun;
elitosztag AddNounae;
elsősegélyprogram AddNoun;
előtag AddNoun;
emlékdóm AddNoun;
encefalogram AddNoun;
epermag AddNoun;
erőkilogramm AddNoun;
estharang AddNoun;
ezredmilligramm AddNoun;
falkatag AddNoun;
farag AddNoun;
fecskehang AddNoun;
fejvadászosztag AddNounae;
felbomláskód AddNoun;
felderítőosztag AddNounae;
felkelőosztag AddNounae;
felvetéscsomag AddNoun;
fickóhang AddNoun;
figyelőosztag AddNounae;
flamingókrokett AddNoun;
foltdiagram AddNoun;
folyamőrosztag AddNounae;
forgatóprogram AddNoun;
fotóretusprogram AddNoun;
frontosztag AddNounae;
futástáv AddNoun;
féldob AddNoun;
fényhullámcsomag AddNoun;
földcsereprogram AddNoun;
füstgázdiagram AddNoun;
fűmag AddNoun;
garanciacsomag AddNoun;
gerillaosztag AddNounae;
golfcsomag AddNoun;
gumiprogram AddNoun;
gyalogososztag AddNounae;
gyalogosztag AddNounae;
gyermekfarm AddNoun;
gyártóprogram AddNoun;
gyújtócsomag AddNoun;
génprogram AddNoun;
gépfegyverosztag AddNounae;
géppuskaosztag AddNounae;
habarcssáv AddNoun;
hadtáposztag AddNounae;
hajóosztag AddNounae;
halszálkadiagram AddNoun;
halálosztag AddNounae;
hangyafarm AddNoun;
határprojekt AddNoun;
hernyóosztag AddNounae;
heroincsomag AddNoun;
hidászosztag AddNounae;
hokiprogram AddNoun;
horizontprogram AddNoun;
huszárosztag AddNounae;
hájprogram AddNoun;
héliummag AddNoun;
híradóosztag AddNounae;
hósáv AddNoun;
idegmag AddNoun;
ikonsáv AddNoun;
indulóhang AddNoun;
innovációmenedzsment AddNoun;
irányítósáv AddNoun;
jelcsomag AddNoun;
jelzőosztag AddNounae;
jelöltmenedzsment AddNoun;
járműprojekt AddNoun;
járőrosztag AddNounae;
jövedelemprogram AddNoun;
kalózrang AddNoun;
kampányosztag AddNounae;
kapcsolóprogram AddNoun;
karanténosztag AddNounae;
kartogram AddNoun;
katonaosztag AddNounae;
kavicssivatag AddNoun;
kecskeosztag AddNounae;
keresztdob AddNoun;
keresőosztag AddNounae;
keréksáv AddNoun;
kiegészítőcsomag AddNoun;
kisharang AddNoun;
kitelepítőosztag AddNounae;
kivégzőosztag AddNounae;
klubtag AddNoun;
kolesztag AddNoun;
kommandóosztag AddNounae;
konfigurációmenedzsment AddNoun;
konyhaprogram AddNoun;
koszorútáv AddNoun;
kultúramenedzsment AddNoun;
kutatóosztag AddNounae;
kábeldob AddNoun;
kábítószerosztag AddNounae;
kékláng AddNoun;
kényszermunkaosztag AddNounae;
képzettségprogram AddNoun;
kézimunkacsomag AddNoun;
kínzóosztag AddNounae;
ködharang AddNoun;
könyvtárprogram AddNoun;
követelményprogram AddNoun;
középtáv AddNoun;
küldöncosztag AddNounae;
kősivatag AddNoun;
lapprogram AddNoun;
lemezharang AddNoun;
levélprogram AddNoun;
lombikprogram AddNoun;
lovasosztag AddNounae;
lovasrohamosztag AddNounae;
lánckorong AddNoun;
légkörprogram AddNoun;
lóbabmag AddNoun;
magiszterprogram AddNoun;
mangófarm AddNoun;
marketingosztag AddNounae;
medvehang AddNoun;
mellhang AddNoun;
mentőosztag AddNounae;
menüprogram AddNoun;
minimumprogram AddNoun;
modellcsomag AddNoun;
mosásprogram AddNoun;
munkacsoporttag AddNoun;
munkaosztag AddNounae;
munkásosztag AddNounae;
mágnessáv AddNoun;
médiaprojekt AddNoun;
mészárszékprogram AddNoun;
műkód AddNoun;
nagyoktáv AddNoun;
negyedtáv AddNoun;
nyeléshang AddNoun;
nyugtatótag AddNoun;
névmonogram AddNoun;
okmányprogram AddNoun;
olívamag AddNoun;
oszlopdob AddNoun;
osztag AddNounae;
ovisosztag AddNounae;
palántamag AddNoun;
parasztgőg AddNoun;
partizánosztag AddNounae;
paszulyláng AddNoun;
petróleumsáv AddNoun;
plasztikkorong AddNoun;
porcelánkorong AddNoun;
presztízsrang AddNoun;
propángázláng AddNoun;
pályacsomag AddNoun;
pártosztag AddNounae;
pénzkorong AddNoun;
ragasztóprogram AddNoun;
reaktorprogram AddNoun;
rekonstrukcióprojekt AddNoun;
rendőrosztag AddNounae;
repkénysáv AddNoun;
repülőosztag AddNounae;
riadóosztag AddNounae;
rizikómenedzsment AddNoun;
robbantóosztag AddNounae;
rohamosztag AddNounae;
ruciprogram AddNoun;
régióprogram AddNoun;
rézprogram AddNoun;
sakkozóprogram AddNoun;
segédosztag AddNounae;
segélyosztag AddNounae;
selyemcafrang AddNoun;
sorsáv AddNoun;
statisztaforgatag AddNoun;
szabadságprogram AddNoun;
szabotőrosztag AddNounae;
szalmaasztag AddNoun;
szekciótag AddNoun;
szekerészosztag AddNounae;
szemöldöksáv AddNoun;
szerverkód AddNoun;
szigetprojekt AddNoun;
szitadob AddNoun;
szolárcsomag AddNoun;
szálfavastag AddNoun;
szállítóosztag AddNounae;
számítógépkód AddNoun;
szénprojekt AddNoun;
színészhang AddNoun;
szórásdiagram AddNoun;
szőlővédszent AddNoun;
síráshang AddNoun;
talpkorong AddNoun;
tanyaprogram AddNoun;
tartóhang AddNoun;
telegramm AddNoun;
tengerhang AddNoun;
terméksáv AddNoun;
terrorosztag AddNounae;
testülettag AddNoun;
testőrosztag AddNounae;
tevésosztag AddNounae;
tinédzserhang AddNoun;
topprogram AddNoun;
tripladob AddNoun;
trénosztag AddNounae;
trükkosztag AddNounae;
táblacsomag AddNoun;
tápcsomag AddNoun;
távmunkacsomag AddNoun;
típuscsomag AddNoun;
tömítésprogram AddNoun;
túlóraprogram AddNoun;
tüzérosztag AddNounae;
tűzfalcsomag AddNoun;
tűzoltóosztag AddNounae;
tűzosztag AddNounae;
utazásmenedzsment AddNoun;
utászosztag AddNounae;
vadászgéposztag AddNounae;
vadászosztag AddNounae;
valenciasáv AddNoun;
vasútnyomtáv AddNoun;
vasútosztag AddNounae;
verőosztag AddNounae;
vetélkedőcsomag AddNoun;
vezérosztag AddNounae;
videocsomag AddNoun;
világrang AddNoun;
vitorlavászonsáv AddNoun;
vonatosztag AddNounae;
válaszkód AddNoun;
várharang AddNoun;
védőosztag AddNounae;
végkorong AddNoun;
vízeséshang AddNoun;
zabmag AddNoun;
zombiosztag AddNounae;
zsaluprojekt AddNoun;
zsiványosztag AddNounae;
zárkód AddNoun;
záróosztag AddNounae;
államkód AddNoun;
árfolyamsáv AddNoun;
árkászosztag AddNounae;
átlépősáv AddNoun;
éjjeliőrosztag AddNounae;
életpályaprogram AddNoun;
épületmenedzsment AddNoun;
észprogram AddNoun;
íjászosztag AddNounae;
óracsomag AddNoun;
önkéntesosztag AddNounae;
örvénymag AddNoun;
örömosztag AddNounae;
újoncosztag AddNounae;
úszótáv AddNoun;
üstdobhang AddNoun;
ütegosztag AddNounae;
őrosztag AddNounae;
őrprogram AddNoun;
őrségosztag AddNounae;
űrállomásprogram AddNoun;
arcplakett AddNoun;
erőgépbalett AddNoun;
heroinkartell AddNoun;
kőrisparkett AddNoun;
repülőmakett AddNoun;
tőzsdeparkett AddNoun;
örömmakett AddNoun;
